Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-120
Interstate matters.

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, an assignment made under the law of another state must be recognized and enforced on an issue if the result for the issue would be substantially similar to the result for the issue if the assignment had been made under the Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act.

(b) If a claim for wages, salaries, or commissions or a claim of a governmental unit exists in another state, for the purpose of determining the priority of the claim under subdivision (f)(2) of section 6-115, the assignee shall use the amount asserted or determined under the law of the other state.

(c) If an assignee determines that a creditor should receive the treatment the creditor would receive under an assignment made under the law of another state, the assignee may treat the creditor as the creditor would be treated in the other state.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 20.
July 18, 2026